Hawaii statutes.
§490:4A-211 Cancellation and amendment of
payment order. (a) A communication of the sender of a payment order
canceling or amending the order may be transmitted to the receiving bank
orally, electronically, or in writing. If a security procedure is in effect
between the sender and the receiving bank, the communication is not effective
to cancel or amend the order unless the communication is verified pursuant to
the security procedure or the bank agrees to the cancellation or amendment.

(b) Subject to subsection (a), a communication
by the sender canceling or amending a payment order is effective to cancel or
amend the order if notice of the communication is received at a time and in a
manner affording the receiving bank a reasonable opportunity to act on the
communication before the bank accepts the payment order.

(c) After a payment order has been accepted,
cancellation or amendment of the order is not effective unless the receiving
bank agrees or a funds-transfer system rule allows cancellation or amendment
without agreement of the bank.

(1) With respect to a payment order accepted by a
receiving bank other than the beneficiary's bank, cancellation or amendment is
not effective unless a conforming cancellation or amendment of the payment
order issued by the receiving bank is also made.

(2) With respect to a payment order accepted by the
beneficiary's bank, cancellation or amendment is not effective unless the order
was issued in execution of an unauthorized payment order, or because of a
mistake by a sender in the funds transfer which resulted in the issuance of a
payment order (i) that is a duplicate of a payment order previously issued by
the sender, (ii) that orders payment to a beneficiary not entitled to receive
payment from the originator, or (iii) that orders payment in an amount greater
than the amount the beneficiary was entitled to receive from the originator.
If the payment order is canceled or amended, the beneficiary's bank is entitled
to recover from the beneficiary any amount paid to the beneficiary to the
extent allowed by the law governing mistake and restitution.

(d) An unaccepted payment order is canceled by
operation of law at the close of the fifth funds-transfer business day of the
receiving bank after the execution date or payment date of the order.

(e) A canceled payment order cannot be
accepted. If an accepted payment order is canceled, the acceptance is
nullified and no person has any right or obligation based on the acceptance.
Amendment of a payment order is deemed to be cancellation of the original order
at the time of amendment and issue of a new payment order in the amended form
at the same time.

(f) Unless otherwise provided in an agreement
of the parties or in a funds-transfer system rule, if the receiving bank, after
accepting a payment order, agrees to cancellation or amendment of the order by
the sender or is bound by a funds-transfer system rule allowing cancellation or
amendment without the bank's agreement, the sender, whether or not cancellation
or amendment is effective, is liable to the bank for any loss and expenses,
including reasonable attorney's fees, incurred by the bank as a result of the
cancellation or amendment or attempted cancellation or amendment.

(g) A payment order is not revoked by the death
or legal incapacity of the sender unless the receiving bank knows of the death
or of an adjudication of incapacity by a court of competent jurisdiction and
has reasonable opportunity to act before acceptance of the order.

(h) A funds-transfer system rule is not
effective to the extent it conflicts with subsection (c)(2). [L 1991, c 41, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next